Louisiana, session 2026, HB664.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1 R.S. 33:1243(A)(1) and (2) and (B)(1) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§1243. Maximum penalties
A.(1) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, the maximum penalty
which may be imposed for violation of any parish ordinance shall be a fine of five
hundred one thousand five hundred dollars and imprisonment of thirty days in the
parish jail. A maximum of one hundred hours of community service may be
imposed for a violation of any parish ordinance in addition to, or in lieu of, any
penalty provided for in this Section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection or any
other law to the contrary, in the parish of East Baton Rouge, the maximum penalty
which may be imposed for violation of any parish ordinance as codified in Title 11
or 13 of the Code of Ordinances for the parish of East Baton Rouge and the city of
Baton Rouge shall be a fine of one thousand five hundred dollars and imprisonment
of six months in the parish jail. Maximum penalties for violations of ordinances
other than those provided for in this Paragraph shall be as established in Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 664 ENROLLED
B.(1) In the parish of Jefferson, except as to properties zoned or used for
industrial activities, the maximum penalty which may be imposed for violation of
any parish ordinance shall be a fine of one thousand five hundred dollars and
imprisonment of six months in the parish jail. Notwithstanding any provision of this
Section to the contrary, in the parish of Jefferson, properties zoned or used for
industrial activities may be subject to penalties for violation of parish ordinances not
to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars upon the first violation and not to exceed fifty
thousand dollars for a second or subsequent violation.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.